Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2112.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3127 of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 3127. Indecent exposure.* * *(c) Sentencing enhancement.--The Pennsylvania Commission on Sentencing, in accordance with 42 Pa.C.S. § 2154 (relating to adoption of guidelines for sentencing), shall provide for a sentence enhancement within its guidelines for a person who commits indecent exposure for the purpose of sexual arousal or sexual gratification.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.1234567891011121314151617